Utah statutes.
53A-2-114.   Additional levies -- School board options to abolish or continue after consolidation.

(1)  If a school district that has approved an additional levy under Section 53A-17a-133 is consolidated with a district which does not have such a levy, the board of education of the consolidated district may choose to abolish the levy, or apply it in whole or in part to the entire consolidated district.

(2)  If the board chooses to apply any part of the levy to the entire district, the levy may continue in force for no more than three years, unless approved by the electors of the consolidated district in the manner set forth in Section 53A-17a-133.



Amended by Chapter 371, 2011 General Session

